Indiana, session 2026, HB1374.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-28-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 6.5. Additional Conditions for the Provision of Job
Creation Incentives
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Contract" means:
(A) an agreement (including any memoranda of
understanding) between an employer and the corporation;
and
(B) an agreement between an employer and a labor
organization.
(2) "Employee" means an individual who performs services
for an employer for wages that are subject to withholding
requirements under Section 3402 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(3) "Employer" means a business entity that voluntarily
2026 IN 1374—LS 6766/DI 129


pursues job creation incentives or enters into an agreement
with the corporation to receive a job creation incentive.
(4) "Job creation incentive" has the meaning set forth in
IC 5-28-2-5.5.
(5) "Labor organization" has the meaning set forth in 29
U.S.C. 152.
(6) "Neutrality agreement" means an agreement signed with
a union in which the employer agrees to conditions including
committing not to speak to employees about union issues.
(7) "Personal contact information" means an employee's
home address, home or personal cellular telephone number,
or personal electronic mail address.
(8) "Secret ballot election" means a process conducted by the
National Labor Relations Board in which an employee casts
a secret ballot for or against labor organization
representation.
(9) "Subcontractor" means an individual or entity that has
contracted with the employer to perform work or provide
services.
Sec. 2. (a) This section does not apply to a contract in effect on
June 30, 2026. However, if a contract is amended, renewed, or
modified on or after July 1, 2026, the contract must conform to this
section.
(b) To be eligible to receive a job creation incentive, an
employer must not take any of the following actions:
(1) Grant recognition rights for employees solely and
exclusively on the basis of signed union authorization cards if
the selection of a bargaining representative may instead be
conducted through a secret ballot election.
(2) Voluntarily disclose an employee's personal contact
information to a labor organization, or third party acting on
behalf of a labor organization, without the employee's prior
written consent, unless otherwise required by state or federal
law.
(3) Sign a neutrality agreement with a labor organization.
(4) Require a subcontractor to engage in activities prohibited
in subdivision (1).
The prohibitions set forth in this subsection apply to any work or
service for the employer on the project for which the job creation
incentive is provided.
(c) The requirements of subsection (b) are in addition to the
requirements of IC 5-28-6-6 and any other terms applicable to the
2026 IN 1374—LS 6766/DI 129


job creation incentive.
Sec. 3. This section applies to job creation incentives disbursed
or provided after June 30, 2026. Before the corporation may
provide a job creation incentive to an employer, the corporation
must execute a separate agreement with the recipient of the job
creation incentive that reserves the right of the corporation to
recover the value of the job creation incentive if the recipient
benefitting from the job creation incentive fails to comply with
section 2 of this chapter. The separate agreement required by this
section must have a term of not less than:
(1) the term the corporation would require for a job creation
incentive of less than five million dollars ($5,000,000); or
(2) twenty (20) years, for a job creation incentive of five
million dollars ($5,000,000) or more.
This section is supplemental to the requirements of IC 5-28-6-6,
IC 5-28-28-7, and any other terms applicable to recovery of a job
creation incentive.
Sec. 4. (a) A person may report, based upon a reasonable belief,
a suspected violation of section 2 of this chapter to the corporation.
However, the report must be made during the term of the separate
agreement entered into between the corporation and the employer
under section 3 of this chapter. Upon receiving a report under this
section, the corporation shall determine whether a violation has
occurred.
(b) If the corporation finds that an employer has violated section
2 of this chapter, then the corporation shall deliver written notice
of the corporation's findings to the:
(1) employer; and
(2) office of the attorney general to initiate proceedings to
recover funds under section 3 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1374—LS 6766/DI 129